Hawaii, session 2025, SB736.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that setting a target goal of thirty per cent of food served in public schools to consist of locally sourced products, as established pursuant to Act 175, Session Laws of Hawaii 2021, is of great benefit for the health of Hawaii's students.  The legislature believes that establishing a recognition program that incentivizes schools to plan for and meet the farm to school meals goal will ensure that the goal will be met by 2030. The legislature further finds that the average meat and dairy products served in schools are highly processed and treated with antibiotics and growth hormones, which can impact health outcomes.  Additionally, the agricultural industry, including produce, animals, and grain, generates approximately one fourth of all greenhouse gas emissions.  A reduction in meat consumption can be beneficial not only to the environment but to the health of Hawaii's students. The legislature additionally finds that a plant-based diet has been shown to reduce the chance of developing diabetes, cardiovascular disease, and cancers, among other things.  Offering vegetarian meals can also greatly increase demand for local greens and promote local farming jobs and agriculture.  Providing vegetarian meals to students can promote not only a healthy lifestyle for the State's youth but the making of environmentally conscious personal decisions. The purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Authorize the department of education to establish a recognition program to incentivize schools to submit to the department a plan for the school to reach the local farm to school meal goal of thirty per cent of food served in the school to consist of locally sourced products by 2030; and (2)  Require department of education high schools to provide a plant-based option as a school meal. SECTION 2. Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding two new sections to part II, subpart C to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-    Farm to school meals; recognition program. (a)  The department may establish a recognition program to incentivize individual department schools to submit to the department a plan for the school to reach the local farm to school meal goal of thirty per cent of food served in the school to consist of locally sourced products by 2030, established pursuant to section 302A-405.6. (b)  The department shall establish guidelines for the recognition program, including what incentives to award to schools who commit to and reach the local farm to school meal goals. §302A-    School meals; plant-based options.  (a)  The department shall require all department high schools to provide a plant-based meal as an option under the school meals program. (b)  Department high schools may establish a day within the school week to provide only plant-based options for school meals. (c)  Department high schools shall establish their own guidelines, with the approval of the department, that incorporate nutritional guidelines, menu planning, and staffing to carry out the purposes of this section." SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________